Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2337
Events of independent significance.

A will may dispose of property by reference to acts and events which have significance apart from their effect upon the dispositions made by the will, whether they occur before or after the execution of the will or before or after the testator's death. The execution or revocation of a will of another individual is such an event.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 59, UPC § 2-512.